src-fst-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Sublexica for Adjective

## Even-syllable stems

LEXICON GIEVRRA  Adjectives with attribute in WeG and -s. As 1a in Spiik. Sg Acc: gievrav, Attr: gievras.

* gárttje # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *gárttje:* `gárttje+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gártjev:* `gárttje+A+Sg+Acc`
* *gártjes:* `gárttje+A+Attr`
* *gártjep:* `gárttje+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON NUORRA   Adjectives with attribute same as pred. As 1b in Spiik. Sg Acc: nuorav, Attr: nuorra.

* visská # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *visská:* `visská+A+Sg+Nom`
* *viskáv:* `visská+A+Sg+Acc`
* *visská:* `visská+A+Attr`
* *viskáp:* `visská+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON GALLJE   Adjectives on -e, the attribute is in WeG and e > a. As 1d in Spiik. Sg Acc: galjev, Attr: galja.

* uhttse # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *uhttse:* `uhttse+A+Sg+Nom`
* *uhtsev:* `uhttse+A+Sg+Acc`
* *uhtsa:* `uhttse+A+Attr`
* *uhtses:* `uhttse+A+Attr` (Eng. # gets this attr from)
* *uhtsep:* `uhttse+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON TJÁBBE   Adjectives on -e, the attribute is in WeG and e > a. Same as GALLJE only different adv derivation. Sg Acc: tjáppev, Attr: tjáppa.

* njálgge # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *njálgge:* `njálgge+A+Sg+Nom`
* *njálgev:* `njálgge+A+Sg+Acc`
* *njálga:* `njálgge+A+Attr`
* *njálgep:* `njálgge+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON VILLDA   Adjectives with attribute same as pred, without CG. As 1b in Spiik. Sg Acc: nuorav, Attr: nuorra.

* frisska # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *frisska:* `frisska+A+Sg+Nom`
* *frisskav:* `frisska+A+Sg+Acc`
* *frisska:* `frisska+A+Attr`
* *frisskap:* `frisska+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON HÁVSSKE   Adjectives with attribute -s, without WeG. As 1c in Spiik. Sg Acc: hávsskev, Attr: hávsskes.

* hoallá # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *hoallá:* `hoallá+A+Sg+Nom`
* *hoalláv:* `hoallá+A+Sg+Acc`
* *hoallás:* `hoallá+A+Attr`
* *hoalláp:* `hoallá+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON TJUODDJE  Adjectives with attribute -is, without WeG. presently only "Tjuoddje" Sg Acc: tjuoddjev, Attr: tjuoddjis.

* tjuoddje # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *tjuoddje:* `tjuoddje+A+Sg+Nom`
* *tjuoddjev:* `tjuoddje+A+Sg+Acc`
* *tjuoddjis:* `tjuoddje+A+Attr`
* *tjuoddjep:* `tjuoddje+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

Pres.participles 

LEXICON SÁVADAHTTE   Causative-participles. No attribute. No comparision. As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: sávadahttev. PrsPrc of causative verbs "uttrykker at handlingen lar seg gjøre eller er verdt å gjøre" (Kintel 1991).

* vuojedahtte # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *vuojedahtte:* `vuojedahtte+A+Sg+Nom`
* *vuojedahttev:* `vuojedahtte+A+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON JUHKKE   participles with -s attributive. No comparision As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: juhkkev, Attr: juhkkes. Spiik: presens particip har med den attributive formen på -s betydelsen "någon som är duktig i, snabb til att, begiven att utföra handlingen".

* vuohttje # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *vuohttje:* `vuohttje+A+Sg+Nom`
* *vuohttjev:* `vuohttje+A+Sg+Acc`
* *vuohttjes:* `vuohttje+A+Attr`

LEXICON BÅRRE   participles without the -s attributive. As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: bårrev, Attr: bårre. Spiik: presens particip har med den attributiva formen utan -s betydelsen ºdem  som utför handlingenº.

* ednabårre # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *ednabårre:* `ednabårre+A+Sg+Nom`
* *ednabårrev:* `ednabårre+A+Sg+Acc`
* *ednabårre:* `ednabårre+A+Attr`

Test data:

Loan words lexicas

###  Correctly assimilated loanwords, derived from real noun.

LEXICON METÅVDÅLASJ  LOAN! Foreign -isk adjectives adapted in updated normative way. To smj ending -alasj, adjective is truly derived from a noun. Mekanisk-mekanihkka-mekanihkalasj, instead of mekánalasj that goes to MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS. Pred and attr are both -alasj. Attr same as pred. With comparatives. 

LEXICON METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL 

* kapitalismalasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *kapitalismalasj:* `kapitalismalasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *kapitalismalattjav:* `kapitalismalasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *kapitalismalasj:* `kapitalismalasj+A+Attr`
* *kapitalismalabbo:* `kapitalismalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ  LOAN! Same type of adjectives as METÅVDÅLASJ, only for adjektives that become mekanihkalasj in norway and mekanijkalasj in sweden, because of differences mekanik vs mekanikk>mekanijkka vs mekanihkka.  Attr same as pred. With comparatives. 

LEXICON IJJALASJ  Just lik  METÅVDÅLASJ only for words ending on ijjalasj/iddjalasj, so that we don't need a lot of Area and Err tags in stems file.

LEXICON IJJALASJ_CMP_INFL 

LEXICON OGIJJALASJ  Just like IJJALASJ only for words ending on ogijjalasj/ogiddjalasj, so that we don't need a lot of err tags in stems files. For words like "pedagogijjalasj" which also have "pedagåvgålasj" (not really a wrong derivation, but doesn't mean pedagogisk) and "pedagogalasj" err taged.  

LEXICON OGIJJALASJ_CMP_INFL  

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL  -sjonal/sjonell and -tional/tionel loanwords. Only for words that work as nouns, so that they are REAL dervations, as nasjonal-nasjåvnnå-nasjåvnålasj. NOT for words like "rasjonell", with no real noun. Words as "rasjonell>rasjonálla-rasjonálalasj" go to lexicon ÁLLA.  The fake derivation "nasjonálalasj" is err taged, so is the strange "nasjonálla/nasjunálla". 

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL_CMP_INFL  

* konstitusjåvnålasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *nasjåvnålasj:* `nasjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *nasjåvnålattjav:* `nasjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *nasjåvnålasj:* `nasjåvnålasj+A+Attr`

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL  -sjonal/sjonell and -tional/tionel loanwords. Only for words that work as nouns, so that they are REAL dervations, as nasjonal-nasjåvnnå-nasjåvnålasj. NOT for words like "rasjonell", with no real noun. Words as "rasjonell>rasjonálla-rasjonálalasj" go to lexicon ÁLLA.  The fake derivation "nasjonálalasj" is err taged, so is the strange "nasjonálla/nasjunálla". 

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL_CMP_INFL  

* konstitusjåvnålasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *konstitusjåvnålasj:* `konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *konstitusjåvnålattjav:* `konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *konstitusjåvnålasj:* `konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Attr`

###  Badly assimilated loanwords, some against norm others with no norm

LEXICON MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS  LOAN! Wronly assimilated -lasj adjectives from SE/NO -isk. Looks derived but isn't since there is no real noun to be derived from. Like mekanisk-mekánalasj, but "mekádna" is no real noun! Like  METÅVDÅLASJ, but gives the Err/Der tag, so it's only for these wronly/non-derived loan adjectives. 

LEXICON ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL  Foreign -isk, that are not real derivations. Same as MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS, but no +Use/-Spell tag since ther is no "right" way to assimilate these. This is a question for GG. Adapted to smj by simply adding -alasj in place of -isk. These are not real derivations, but sitation borrowed loan adjectives. Only words without a noun base, like arktisk and syntetisk. Pred and attr are both -lasj. No comparatives. 

* syntetalasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *syntetalasj:* `syntetalasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *syntetalattjav:* `syntetalasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *syntetalasj:* `syntetalasj+A+Attr`

LEXICON ORÁNSSJA  Loan adjectives, not -isk. Used without the -lasj. Adjectives with attribute same as pred. So far only for oránssja.

LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM  Loan adjectives from norwegian/swedish (Not adjectives ending on -isk). Words like demonstrativ, transitiv, dupleks, informativ, analog, privat. Gives both "demonstratijvva" and "demonstratijvalasj". Two ways of adapting these adjectives are used, the adding of -lasj isn't okey, because that's a false derivation. But GG hasn't decided how these should be handled. Looks like noun instead of adjective when adapted without the -lasj ending.  Attr is in weak grad, used in strong grad ass pred even thou this seems a little bit odd "Værbba l transitijvva". 

LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_CMP_INFL    

* aktijvva # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *aktijva:* `aktijvva+A+Attr`
* *aktijvva:* `aktijvva+A+Sg+Nom`
* *aktijvav:* `aktijvva+A+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM  Same as DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM. Only for adjectives ending on -al. Words like digital,liberal, lokal.  Gives both "eksponentiálla" and "eksponentiálalasj". Different lexicon for these -al adjectives because of Err/Orth tags. OBS, "dialektal", is assimilated "dialevtalasj", and goes to lexicon  METÅVDÅLASJ.

LEXICON ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP 

LEXICON ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM  Loanwords, same as ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM  and  DEMONSTRANTIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM. For NO and SE adjectives ending on -ell, eksperimentell, ideell, parallell. The short form is nom parallælla, attr, parallella The long form: paralellalasj, attr parallellalasj. Different lexicon for these -ell adjectives because of err/orth tags. OBS, "individuell", is assimilated "indivijdalasj", and goes to lexicon  METÅVDÅLASJ.

LEXICON ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP  

LEXICON ÁLLA-ÆLLA 

LEXICON MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL  Same as  METÅVDÅLASJ only without vuohta. 

Inherent comparatives and superlatives lexica

LEXICON OANEP   Inherent comparatives, gives comp and superl. There are two main groups of word here: Adjectives that are lexicalized in their comparative (and superlative) forms, like sisŋep, bárep. And Nouns that can be compared, like nuortap, gáttep, oarjep (some of these are compared from their noun lexicas and thus are found twice). Some entries are likely incorrect compared forms of other adjectives, like ådåp and ruvvap (more research needed).

* lagáp # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *lagáp:* `lagáp+A+Gram/Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *lagámus:* `lagáp+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON TJAVGGÁMUS    Inherent superlatives, only gives superl. Some words are lexicalized in their superlative forms, like dájvvámus. Some are likely incorrect superlative forms, like tjábbámus (more research is needed)

* dájvvámus # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *dájvvámus:* `dájvvámus+A+Gram/Superl+Sg+Nom`

4-syllable miscellanious stems

LEXICON ÁRMMOGIS  Adjectives on -is, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. As 2 in Spiik. Sg Acc: ármmogisáv, Attr: ármmogis. 

* bahágis # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *bahágis:* `bahágis+A+Sg+Nom`
* *bahágisáv:* `bahágis+A+Sg+Acc`
* *bahágis:* `bahágis+A+Attr`
* *bahágabbo:* `bahágis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON SÆHKÁLAK  Adjectives on -álak, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. So far only for "sæhkálak".

* sæhkálak # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sæhkálak:* `sæhkálak+A+Sg+Nom`
* *sähkálak:* `sæhkálak+A+Sg+Nom`
* *sæhkálagáv:* `sæhkálak+A+Sg+Acc`
* *sähkálagáv:* `sæhkálak+A+Sg+Acc`
* *sæhkálak:* `sæhkálak+A+Attr`
* *sähkálak:* `sæhkálak+A+Attr`
* *sæhkálabbo:* `sæhkálak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *sähkálabbo:* `sæhkálak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL  Adjectives on -asj, attribute same as pred.  No comparatives. 2 in Spiik. Sg Acc: ållagattjav, Attr: ållagasj.

* belulasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *belulasj:* `belulasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *belulattjav:* `belulasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *belulasj:* `belulasj+A+Attr`

LEXICON DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL  Adjectives on -asj, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: dárbulattjav, Attr: dárbulasj. Essive -attjan, -adtjan is subtaged. Err/Orth also -ahttja.  

* dábálasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *dábálasj:* `dábálasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *dábálattjav:* `dábálasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *dábálasj:* `dábálasj+A+Attr`
* *dábális:* `dábálasj+A+Attr`
* *dábálabbo:* `dábálasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  Adjectives on -asj, -is attr. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: asidattjav, Attr: asidis.

* gågulasj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *gågulasj:* `gågulasj+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gågulattjav:* `gågulasj+A+Sg+Acc`
* *gågulis:* `gågulasj+A+Attr`
* *gågulabbo:* `gågulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON UDNODIBME  Adjectives on -dibme, attribute on -is. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: udnodimev, Attr: udnodis.
